test/src/morphology/N-jarplan_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct. 


  Noun - jarplan e-stem lentokone: # Noun - full paradigm
     jarplan+N+Sg+Nom: jarplan
     jarplan+N+Sg+Gen: jarplaan
     jarplan+N+Sg+Acc: jarplaan
     jarplan+N+Sg+Ill: jarplaaˊne
     jarplan+N+Sg+Loc: jarplaanâst
     jarplan+N+Sg+Com: jarplaanin
     jarplan+N+Ess: jarplaanen
     jarplan+N+Par: jarplaaned
     jarplan+N+Sg+Abe: jarplaantää
     jarplan+N+Pl+Nom: jarplaan
     jarplan+N+Pl+Gen: jarplaani
     jarplan+N+Pl+Acc: jarplaanid
     jarplan+N+Pl+Ill: jarplaanid
     jarplan+N+Pl+Loc: jarplaanin
     jarplan+N+Pl+Com: jarplaanivuiˊm
     jarplan+N+Pl+Abe: jarplaanitää
